Illinois, session 104th, HB5540.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by adding 5Section 7-141.5 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/7-141.5 new)7    Sec. 7-141.5. Retirement annuity; interest payment. If the 8payment of a retirement annuity is made to an annuitant more 9than one month after that retirement annuity payment became 10payable, then the Fund shall pay interest to the annuitant in 11an amount equal to 6% of that payment of the retirement 12annuity. 13    Section 10. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 14changing Section 367j as follows: 15    (215 ILCS 5/367j)  (from Ch. 73, par. 979j)16    Sec. 367j. Municipal employee's continuance privilege. 17    (a) As used in this Section: 18        (1) The term "creditable service" shall have the 19    meaning ascribed to it by Section 7-113 of the Illinois 20    Pension Code. 21        (2) The term "municipality" means any municipality,   HB5540- 2 -LRB104 20668 RPS 34166 b1    instrumentality, or participating instrumentality (as 2    those terms are defined in Sections 7-105, 7-107 and 3    7-108, respectively, of the Illinois Pension Code) that 4    participates in the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund 5    pursuant to Section 7-132 of the Illinois Pension Code. 6        (3) The term "employee" shall mean an employee as 7    defined in Section 7-109 of the Illinois Pension Code, but 8    does not include any person who is a deputy as defined in 9    Section 367h of this Code. 10        (4) The "retirement or disability period" of an 11    employee means the period: 12            (A) which begins on the day the employee is 13        removed from the municipality payroll because of the 14        occurrence of either of the following events: (i) the 15        employee retires from active service as an employee 16        with an attained age and accumulated creditable 17        service which together qualify the employee for 18        immediate receipt of retirement pension benefits under 19        Article 7 of the Illinois Pension Code, or (ii) the 20        employee's disability is established under Article 7 21        of the Illinois Pension Code; and 22            (B) which ends on the first to occur of any of the 23        following events: (i) the employee's reinstatement or 24        reentry into active service as provided for under 25        Article 7 of the Illinois Pension Code, (ii) the 26        employee's exercise of any refund option or acceptance   HB5540- 3 -LRB104 20668 RPS 34166 b1        of any separation benefit available under Article 7 of 2        the Illinois Pension Code, (iii) the employee's loss 3        pursuant to Section 7-219 of the Illinois Pension Code 4        of any benefits provided for in Article 7 of that Code, 5        or (iv) the employee's death or, if at the time of the 6        employee's death the employee is survived by a spouse 7        who, in that capacity, is entitled to receive a 8        surviving spouse's monthly pension pursuant to Article 9        7 of the Illinois Pension Code, the death or 10        remarriage of that spouse.11    (b) No policy of group accident and health insurance under 12which employees of a municipality are insured for their 13individual benefit shall be issued or delivered in this State 14to a municipality unless such group policy provides for the 15election of continued group insurance coverage for the 16retirement or disability period of each employee who is 17insured under the provisions of the group policy on the day 18immediately preceding the day on which the retirement or 19disability period of such employee begins. So long as any 20required premiums for continued group insurance coverage are 21paid in accordance with the provisions of the group policy, an 22election made pursuant to this Section shall provide continued 23group insurance coverage for an employee throughout the 24retirement or disability period of the employee and, unless 25the employee otherwise elects and subject to any other 26provisions of the group policy which relate either to the   HB5540- 4 -LRB104 20668 RPS 34166 b1provision or to the termination of dependents' coverage and 2which are not inconsistent with this Section, for any 3dependents of the employee who are insured under the group 4policy on the day immediately preceding the day on which the 5retirement or disability period of the employee begins; 6provided, however, that when such continued group insurance 7coverage is in effect with respect to an employee on the date 8of the employee's death but the retirement or disability 9period of the employee does not end with the employee's death, 10then the deceased employee's surviving spouse upon whose death 11or remarriage such retirement or disability period will end 12shall be entitled, without further election and upon payment 13of any required premiums in accordance with the provisions of 14the group policy, to maintain such continued group insurance 15coverage in effect until the end of the retirement or 16disability period. Continued group insurance coverage shall be 17provided in accordance with this Section at the same premium 18rate from time to time charged for equivalent coverage 19provided under the group policy with respect to covered 20employees whose retirement or disability period has not begun, 21and no distinction or discrimination in the amount or rate of 22premiums or in any waiver of premium or other benefit 23provision shall be made between continued group insurance 24coverage elected pursuant to this Section and equivalent 25coverage provided to employees under the group policy other 26than pursuant to the provisions of this Section; provided that   HB5540- 5 -LRB104 20668 RPS 34166 b1no municipality shall be required by reason of any provision 2of this Section to pay any group insurance premium other than 3one that may be negotiated in a collective bargaining 4agreement. If the group policy provides for a reduction in 5benefits and premium for insureds who become eligible for 6medicare, such provision shall apply to persons electing 7continued coverage under this Section.8    Within 15 days of the beginning of the retirement or 9disability period of any employee entitled to elect continued 10group insurance coverage under any group policy affected by 11this Section, the municipality last employing such employee 12shall give written notice of such beginning by certified mail, 13return receipt requested, to the insurance company issuing 14such policy. The notice shall include the employee's name and 15last known place of residence and the beginning date of the 16employee's retirement or disability period.17    Within 15 days of the date of receipt of such notice from 18the municipality, the insurance company by certified mail, 19return receipt requested, shall give written notice to the 20employee at the employee's last known place of residence that 21coverage under the group policy may be continued for the 22retirement or disability period of the employee as provided in 23this Section. Such notice shall set forth: (i) a statement of 24election to be filed by the employee if the employee wishes to 25continue such group insurance coverage, (ii) the amount of 26monthly premium, including a statement of the portion of such   HB5540- 6 -LRB104 20668 RPS 34166 b1monthly premium attributable to any dependents' coverage which 2the employee may elect, and (iii) instructions as to the 3return of the election form to the insurance company issuing 4such policy. Election shall be made, if at all, by returning 5the statement of election to the insurance company by 6certified mail, return receipt requested, within 15 days after 7having received it.8    If the employee elects to continue coverage, it shall be 9the obligation of the employee to pay the monthly premium 10directly to the municipality which shall forward it to the 11insurance company issuing the group insurance policy, or as 12otherwise directed by the insurance company; provided, 13however, that the employee shall be entitled to designate on 14the statement of election required to be filed with the 15insurance company that the total monthly premium, or such 16portion thereof as is not contributed by a municipality, be 17deducted by the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund from the 18monthly pension payment otherwise payable to or on behalf of 19the employee pursuant to Article 7 of the Illinois Pension 20Code, and be remitted by such Fund to the insurance company. If 21the employee has elected to have the monthly premium deducted 22by the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund from the employee's 23monthly pension payment, then the Illinois Municipal 24Retirement Fund shall promptly remit the premium payments to 25the insurance company, regardless of whether the employee's 26monthly pension payment has been paid to the employee. The   HB5540- 7 -LRB104 20668 RPS 34166 b1portion, if any, of the monthly premium contributed by a 2municipality for such continued group insurance coverage shall 3be paid by the municipality directly to the insurance company 4issuing the group insurance policy, or as directed by the 5insurance company. Such continued group insurance coverage 6shall relate back to the beginning of the employee's 7retirement or disability period.8    The amendment, renewal or extension of any group insurance 9policy affected by this Section shall be deemed to be the 10issuance of a new policy of insurance for purposes of this 11Section.12    (c) In the event that a municipality makes a program of 13accident, health, hospital or medical benefits available to 14its employees through self-insurance, or by participation in a 15pool or reciprocal insurer, or by contract in a form other than 16a policy of group insurance with one or more medical service 17plans, health care service corporations, health maintenance 18organizations, or any other professional corporations or plans 19under which health care or reimbursement for the costs thereof 20is provided, whether the cost of such benefits is borne by the 21municipality or the employees or both, such employees and 22their surviving spouses shall have the same right to elect 23continued coverage under such program of benefits as they 24would have if such benefits were provided by a policy of group 25accident and health insurance. In such cases, the notice of 26right to elect continued coverage shall be sent by the   HB5540- 8 -LRB104 20668 RPS 34166 b1municipality; the statement of election shall be sent to the 2municipality; and references to the required premium shall 3refer to that portion of the cost of such benefits which is not 4borne by the municipality, either voluntarily or pursuant to 5the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement. In the 6case of a municipality providing such benefits through 7self-insurance or participation in a pool or reciprocal 8insurer, the right to elect continued coverage which is 9provided by this paragraph shall be implemented and made 10available to the employees of the municipality and qualifying 11surviving spouses not later than July 1, 1991.12    The amendment, renewal or extension of any such contract 13in a form other than a policy of group insurance policy shall 14be deemed the formation of a new contract for the purposes of 15this Section.16    (d) This Section shall not limit the exercise of any 17conversion privileges available under Section 367e.18(Source: P.A. 86-1444; 87-435.) 19    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 20Section 8.50 as follows: 21    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)22    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 238 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 24the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory   HB5540- 9 -LRB104 20668 RPS 34166 b1Act of the 104th General Assembly.